Arkansas, session 2025, HB1501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-428(a), concerning the income tax
deduction for depreciation and expensing of property, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) Title 26 U.S.C. §§ 167 and 168(a)-(j), as in effect on January
1, 2019, are adopted for the purpose of computing Arkansas income tax
liability for property purchased in tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2014.
*JLL217*
02/17/2025 11:48:12 AM JLL217

HB1501
(2) Title 26 U.S.C. § 168(k), as in effect on January 1, 2024,
is adopted for the purpose of computing Arkansas income tax liability for
property purchased in tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
(3) Title 26 U.S.C. § 179, as in effect on January 1, 2022, is
adopted for the purpose of computing Arkansas income tax liability for
property purchased in tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.



























02/17/2025 11:48:12 AM JLL217